Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5788.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-18 of the General Laws entitled "Sales and Use Taxes — Liability
and Computation" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-18-41. Prohibition on sales tax for core charges and refundable deposits.
(a) No sales tax shall be collected on a core charge or refundable fee attributable to a
recycling fee, deposit or disposal fee for a battery, or any motor vehicle equipment, part or
component.
(b) Any refundable deposit for a battery, or any motor vehicle equipment, part or
component, which is collected by a retailer shall be held in trust for the state in accordance with §
23-60-3.
(c) The division of taxation shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the
provisions of this section.
(d) The division of taxation shall issue a written notice to all retailers of batteries and motor
vehicle equipment and parts that no sales tax shall be charged for refundable battery deposits and
core charges on any motor vehicle equipment, part or component. This notice shall be posted in a
conspicuous place on the retailer's premises.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000050
========